Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-1201 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control the "Human Trafficking
Awareness and Education Program". The Director of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control may hire an

Req. No. 10725 Page 1

Admi nistrator who shall be responsible for the administration and
operation of the Program, as determined by the Director.
B. The Program shall:
1. Provide objective criteria, guidelines, and a comprehensive
integrated curriculum for human trafficking programs in local
schools and school districts;
2. Establish and annually review model policies for human
trafficking issues including referral for services;
3. Develop and implement strategies which encourage all schools
to employ counselors trained in human trafficking prevention; and
4. Develop guidelines and criteria to encourage teachers and
administrators to receive training on human trafficking. The
training shall be completed the first year a certified teacher is
employed by a school district.
C. Final determination of the materials created and produced by
the Bureau to be used, the means of implementing the curriculum, and
the ages and times at which students receive instruction about human
trafficking prevention shall be made by the school district board of
education. The school district, at least one (1) month prior to
giving such instruction to students, shall conduct for parents and
guardians of students involved, during weekend or evening hours, at
least one presentation concerning the plans for instruction and the
materials to be used. No student shall be required to receive

Req. No. 10725 Page 2

inst ruction about human trafficking if a parent or guardian of the
student objects in writing.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10725 GRS 01/12/25



















Req. No. 10725 Page 3